Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-428
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 29-422 to 29-429 and 60-684 to 60-686 shall be construed to affect the rights, lawful procedures, or responsibilities of law enforcement agencies or peace officers using the citation procedure in lieu of the arrest or warrant procedure.

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 7;

Laws 1985, LB 19, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 13.